Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.310

Alternative or peremptory writs—Form.

The writ must be either alternative or peremptory. The alternative writ must state generally the allegations against the party to whom it is directed, and command such party to desist or refrain from further proceedings in the action or matter specified therein until the further order of the court from which it is issued, and to show cause before such court, at a specified time and place, why such party should not be absolutely restrained from any further proceedings in such action or matter. The peremptory writ must be in a similar form, except that the words requiring the party to show cause why he or she should not be absolutely restrained, etc., must be omitted and a return day inserted.

[ 2011 c 336 s 168; 1895 c 65 s 31; RRS s 1029.]